apertium-bho.bho.dix
    <pardef n="/जवन__prn">       
      <e><p><l>जवन</l><r>जवन<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>जवन</l><r>जवन<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
 	    <e><p><l>जवन</l><r>जवन<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>जे</l><r>जवन<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>जेकरासे</l><r>जवन<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>जेकरासे</l><r>जवन<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>जेकराके</l><r>जवन<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>जेकराके</l><r>जवन<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>जेकर</l><r>जवन<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="mf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>जेकर</l><r>जवन<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="mf"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>जेकर</l><r>जवन<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="mf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>जेकर</l><r>जवन<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="mf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>जेकर</l><r>जवन<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="mf"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>जेकर</l><r>जवन<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="mf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>जे</l><r>जवन<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>जवन</l><r>जवन<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="mf"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>जइमें</l><r>जवन<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>जइमे</l><r>जवन<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
 	    <e><p><l>जेकरामें</l><r>जवन<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>	
	    <e><p><l>जेकरामे</l><r>जवन<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
     </pardef>

    <pardef n="अपन/ा__prn">
      <e><p><l>ा</l><r>ा<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ा<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>े</l><r>ा<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ा<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>े</l><r>ा<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  </pardef>

    <pardef n="तुंह_लोग__prn">
      <e><p><l>तुंह लोग</l><r>तुंह लोग<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="frm"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>तुंह लोग</l><r>तुंह लोग<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="frm"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<pardef n="हम_को__prn">
      <e><p><l>हम को</l><r>हम को<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<pardef n="हम_लोगो_को__prn">
      <e><p><l>हम लोगो को</l><r>हम लोगो को<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obj"/><s n="pers"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<pardef n="हमलोग__prn">
      <e><p><l>हमलोग</l><r>हमलोग<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pers"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<pardef n="तुंहलोगों_का__prn">
	  <e><p><l>तुंहलोगों का</l><r>तुंहलोगों का<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pers"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<pardef n="उ_लोगों_का__prn">
	  <e><p><l>उ लोगों का</l><r>उ लोगों का<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pers"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<pardef n="खुद_को__prn">
	  <e><p><l>खुद को</l><r>खुद को<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pers"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<pardef n="खुद_ही__prn">
	  <e><p><l>खुद ही</l><r>खुद ही<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pers"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<pardef n="केकर_को__prn">
	  <e><p><l>केकर<b/>को</l><r>केकर<b/>को<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<pardef n="कहंवा_पे__prn">
	  <e><p><l>कहा<b/>पे</l><r>कहा<b/>पे<s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 

	<pardef n="एगो_और__prn">
	  <e><p><l>एगो<b/>और</l><r>एगो<b/>और<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<pardef n="कुछु_भी__prn">
	  <e><p><l>कुछु<b/>भी</l><r>कुछु<b/>भी<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<pardef n="सब_लोग__prn">
	  <e><p><l>सब<b/>लोग</l><r>सब<b/>लोग<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<pardef n="हर_एक_चीज़__prn">
	  <e><p><l>हर<b/>एक<b/>चीज़</l><r>हर<b/>एक<b/>चीज़<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<pardef n="केहू_नहीं__prn">
	  <e><p><l>केहू<b/>नहीं</l><r>केहू<b/>नहीं<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

	<pardef n="कुछु_एक__prn">
	  <e><p><l>कुछु<b/>एक</l><r>कुछु<b/>एक<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

  <pardef n="हमलोगो_का__prn">
      <e><p><l>हमलोगो<b/>का</l><r>हमलोगो<b/>का<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pers"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>हमलोगो का</l><r>हमलोगो का<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="gen"/><s n="pl"/><s n="pers"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
   
    <pardef n="जेम्स__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 
            
    <pardef n="मैरी__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="भारत__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!--ADVERBS-->

    <pardef n="गलत__adv"> 
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="int__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="rel__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="rel"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="मैरी"><i>मैरी</i><par n="मैरी__np"/></e>
    <e lm="जेम्स"><i>जेम्स</i><par n="जेम्स__np"/></e>
    <e lm="कहवा"><i>कहवा</i><par n="int__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="लगे"><i>लगे</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="त"><i>त</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="आजु"><i>आजु</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="बहरा"><i>बहरा</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="तब"><i>तब</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ना"><i>ना</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="भी"><i>भी</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अब"><i>अब</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="छोटाई"><i>छोटाई</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="जब"><i>जब</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ऐने"><i>ऐने</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ओने"><i>ओने</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="केहू"><i>केहू</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="शायद"><i>शायद</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="धीरे-धीरे"><i>धीरे-धीरे</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="हर"><i>हर</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="हर"><i>हर</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="जवन"><i></i><par n="/जवन__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="तुंह लोग"><i>तुंह<b/>लोग</i><par n="तुंह_लोग__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="हम को"><i>हम<b/>को</i><par n="हम_को__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="हमलोगो का"><i>हमलोगो<b/>का</i><par n="हमलोगो_का__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="हमलोग"><i>हमलोग</i><par n="हमलोग__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="हम लोगो को"><i>हम<b/>लोगो<b/>को</i><par n="हम_लोगो_को__prn"/></e>
	  <e lm="तुंहलोगों का"><i>तुंहलोगों<b/>का</i><par n="तुंहलोगों_का__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="एगो और"><i>एगो<b/>और</i><par n="एगो_और__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="कुछु भी"><i>कुछु<b/>भी</i><par n="कुछु_भी__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="सब लोग"><i>सब<b/>लोग</i><par n="सब_लोग__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="हर एक चीज़"><i>हर<b/>एक<b/>चीज़</i><par n="हर_एक_चीज़__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="केहू नहीं"><i>केहू<b/>नहीं</i><par n="केहू_नहीं__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="कुछु एक"><i>कुछु<b/>एक</i><par n="कुछु_एक__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="केकर को"><i>केकर<b/>को</i><par n="केकर_को__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="कहंवा पे"><i>कहंवा<b/>पे</i><par n="कहंवा_पे__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="खुद ही"><i>खुद<b/>ही</i><par n="खुद_ही__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="खुद को"><i>खुद<b/>को</i><par n="खुद_को__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="उ लोगों का"><i>उन<b/>लोगों<b/>का</i><par n="उ_लोगों_का__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="अइसे"><i>अइसे</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अत"><i>अत</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="हरदम"><i>हरदम</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="उहाँ"><i>उहाँ</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="पूरव"><i>पूरव</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="फेरसे"><i>फेरसे</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="बल्कि"><i>बल्कि</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="बीच"><i>बीच</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अब"><i>अब</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="वास्तवमें"><i>वास्तवमें</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="लगभग"><i>लगभग</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="घास"><i>घास</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="बाद"><i>बाद</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ज़रूर"><i>ज़रूर</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="किसिका"><i>किसिका</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="सब"><i>सब</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="तैयार"><i>तैयार</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="तुरन्ते"><i>तुरन्ते</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="जइसन"><i>जइसन</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="कुछु"><i>कुछु</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="बहुते"><i>बहुते</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="काहे"><i>काहे</i><par n="int__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="जहवा"><i>जहवा</i><par n="rel__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="नइखे है"><i>नइखे<b/>है</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ईहाँ"><i>ईहाँ</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ज़रूर रूप से"><i>ज़रूर<b/>रूप<b/>से</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="साफ़"><i>साफ़</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="हमेशा"><i>हमेशा</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="बाद"><i>बाद</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ज़रूरीसे"><i>ज़रूरीसे</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="वास्तव में"><i>वास्तव<b/>में</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="जदपि"><i>जदपि</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="बाद में"><i>बाद<b/>में</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="बहुते"><i>बहुते</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="बजाय"><i>बजाय</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="फेर से"><i>फेर<b/>से</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अलगे"><i>अलगे</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="पहिले"><i>पहिले</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="बादमे"><i>बादमे</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="पर्याप्त"><i>पर्याप्त</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="नियरे"><i>नियरे</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="न"><i>न</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="दुरे"><i>दुरे</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="थोड़े"><i>थोड़े</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="तो"><i>तो</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="तीसर"><i>तीसर</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="तुरते"><i>तुरते</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="जैसन"><i>जैसन</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="जानबूझके"><i>जानबूझके</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="क्रमश:"><i>क्रमश:</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="कम"><i>कम</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="बहुते"><i>बहुते</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="तुरंते"><i>तुरंते</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अलगे"><i>अलगे</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="अचानकसे"><i>अचानकसे</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="पहले"><i>पहले</i><par n="गलत__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="मई"><i>मई</i><par n="भारत__np"/></e>
    <e lm="अपना"><i>अपन</i><par n="अपन/ा__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="हमारा"><i>हमार</i><par n="अपन/ा__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="इसका"><i>इसक</i><par n="अपन/ा__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="उनकरा"><i>उनकर</i><par n="अपन/ा__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ओकरा"><i>ओकर</i><par n="अपन/ा__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="आपका"><i>आपक</i><par n="अपन/ा__prn"/></e>
